Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-271
Affidavits to correct defects; recording; effect.

Affidavits explaining or correcting any apparent defect in the chain of title to any real estate, may be recorded as instruments affecting real estate, and such record shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein recited.

Laws 1913, c. 75, § 1, p. 218;

R.S.1913, § 6253;

C.S.1922, § 5652;

C.S.1929, § 76-258;

R.S.1943, § 76-271.

Variances in spelling of names may be cured by affidavit. Perry v. Ritze, 110 Neb. 286, 193 N.W. 758 (1923).

Affidavit recorded in office of register of deeds is prima facie evidence of facts stated therein. Schlake v. Healey, 108 Neb. 35, 187 N.W. 427 (1922).